Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.040

"Reasonably ascertainable" creditor—Definition—Reasonable diligence—Presumptions—Petition for order.

(1) For purposes of RCW 11.42.050, a "reasonably ascertainable" creditor of the decedent is one that the notice agent would discover upon exercise of reasonable diligence. The notice agent is deemed to have exercised reasonable diligence upon conducting a reasonable review of the decedent's correspondence, including correspondence received after the date of death, and financial records, including personal financial statements, loan documents, checkbooks, bank statements, and income tax returns, that are in the possession of or reasonably available to the notice agent.

(2) If the notice agent conducts the review, the notice agent is presumed to have exercised reasonable diligence to ascertain creditors of the decedent and any creditor not ascertained in the review is presumed not reasonably ascertainable within the meaning of RCW 11.42.050. These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

(3) The notice agent may evidence the review and resulting presumption by filing with the court an affidavit regarding the facts referred to in this section. The notice agent may petition the court for an order declaring that the notice agent has made a review and that any creditors not known to the notice agent are not reasonably ascertainable. The petition must be filed under RCW 11.96A.080, and the notice specified under RCW 11.96A.110 must also be given by publication.

[ 1999 c 42 s 610; 1997 c 252 s 27; 1994 c 221 s 34.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.